Arkansas, session 2025, SB627.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 17-28-101(1), concerning the definition of
air conditioning electrician, is repealed.
(1) “Air conditioning electrician” means an individual who is
limited to a license classification possessing the necessary qualifications,
training, and technical knowledge for the installation, maintenance, and
extension of electrical conductors and equipment solely for the purpose of
*LGL199*
04-07-2025 15:06:51 LGL199

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB627
supplying heating and air conditioning and refrigeration units;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 17-28-102(c)(1), concerning the
construction and exemptions of line voltage power wiring, is amended to read
as follows:
(c)(1) Any holder of a state-issued heating, ventilation, air
conditioning, and refrigeration, or HVACR, license may run line voltage power
wiring in compliance with the state electric code from a disconnect box to an
outdoor HVACR unit within a distance not to exceed ten (10') seventy-five
(75') feet from any point of the HVACR equipment without obtaining an
electrician's license as required by this chapter.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 17-28-203(a), concerning fees for the
licensing examinations of electricians, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The Board of Electrical Examiners of the State of Arkansas is
authorized to conduct examinations of persons applying for a license as a
master electrician, journeyman electrician, industrial maintenance
electrician, residential master electrician, air conditioning electrician,
specialist sign electrician, or residential journeyman electrician. These
persons shall pay fees established by the board, but in no event shall such
examination fees exceed the following:
(1) Master electrician ............. $100.00
(2) Journeyman electrician ............. 100.00
(3) Industrial maintenance electrician ............. 50.00
(4) Residential master electrician ............. 100.00
(5) Residential journeyman electrician ............. 100.00
(6) Air conditioning electrician ............. 100.00
(7)(6) Specialist sign electrician with parking lot endorsement
............. 100.00

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 17-28-301 is amended to read as follows:
17-28-301. Electrician's license — Issuance and renewal — Fees.
(a) Individuals passing the master, journeyman, residential master,
residential journeyman, air conditioning electrician, specialist sign
electrician, or industrial maintenance electrician's examination as specified
in § 17-28-203 shall be issued a license of the same class as that of the
04-07-2025 15:06:51 LGL199

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB627
examination upon payment of the following fees:
(1) Master electrician ............. $50.00
(2) Journeyman electrician ............. 25.00
(3) Industrial maintenance electrician ............. 25.00
(4) Residential master electrician ............. 50.00
(5) Residential journeyman electrician ............. 25.00
(6) Air conditioning electrician ............. 25.00
(7)(6) Specialist sign electrician with parking lot endorsement
............. 25.00.
(b)(1) Licenses shall expire on the date indicated on the licenses.
(2) The license may be renewed for a period of one (1), two (2),
or three (3) years year with the fee to be as follows:
(A) Master electrician ............. $50.00 per year
(B) Journeyman electrician ............. 25.00 per year
(C) Industrial maintenance electrician ............. 25.00
per year
(D) Residential master electrician ............. 50.00 per
year
(E) Residential journeyman electrician ............. 25.00
per year
(F) Air conditioning electrician ............. 25.00 per
year
(G)(F) Specialist sign electrician with parking lot
endorsement ............. 25.00 per year.
(3) A licensee may renew his or her license within thirty-six
(36) months following the expiration date on the license by paying:
(A) The renewal fee under subdivision (b)(2) of this
section;
(B) A late fee equal to one (1) year of the renewal fee
plus ten dollars ($10.00) for each calendar month between the expiration date
indicated on the license and the date of application for renewal; and
(C) Any outstanding monetary civil penalty.
(4) If a licensee shall fail to renew his or her license within
thirty-six (36) months after the expiration date on the license, the licensee
may reinstate his or her license by retaking the examination required under §
17-28-203 and paying:
04-07-2025 15:06:51 LGL199

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB627
(A) The fees and any applicable penalty under subdivision
(b)(3) of this section; and
(B) An additional penalty of one thousand dollars
($1,000).
(5)(A) The Board of Electrical Examiners of the State of
Arkansas may, after hearing, deny renewal or reinstatement of a license for
cause.
(B) The applicant for renewal or reinstatement of a
license may obtain a temporary license to expire on the date of his or her
hearing before the board.
(6) If a person simultaneously holds an electrical inspector
license and a license as a master electrician or a journeyman electrician,
the person, when renewing his or her master electrician or journeyman
electrician license, shall be exempt from the:
(A) Renewal fee under this section; and
(B) Continuing education requirements for master
electricians and journeyman electricians under § 17-28-311.
(c) The registration fee for an electrical apprentice shall be ten
dollars ($10.00) annually. Apprentice registration certificates shall expire
on the last day of the month, one (1) year following the date of original
registration.
(d)(1) The board may issue a temporary license as a master electrician
or journeyman electrician that is valid for no more than six (6) months and
renewable one (1) time only for industry projects as defined in this chapter,
upon submission by the applicant of the following:
(A) A temporary license fee in the amount established by
subsection (a) of this section;
(B) A completed application on a form furnished and
approved by the board; and
(C) Evidence that the applicant:
(i) Holds a current license of the same
classification issued by another state; or
(ii) Meets the experience qualifications required
under rules promulgated by the board for a temporary master electrician or a
temporary journeyman electrician.
(2) The Director of the Division of Occupational and
04-07-2025 15:06:51 LGL199

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB627
Professional Licensing Boards and Commissions Department of Labor and
Licensing may renew a temporary license as a master electrician or journeyman
electrician issued by the board for more than one (1) additional period of
six (6) months, if:
(A) The renewal is for work to be performed on a specific
industry project as defined in this chapter;
(B) The director department determines that the additional
renewal is necessary because:
(i) Actual construction will exceed one (1) year;
and
(ii) An insufficient number of licensed electricians
is available to perform the necessary work;
(C) The temporary license is restricted to the industry
project for which it is issued; and
(D) A temporary license fee in the amount established in
subsection (a) of this section is paid.
(3)(A) The board may issue and renew a temporary license as a
master electrician or journeyman electrician for regularly scheduled or
emergency maintenance work or shutdowns of not longer than six (6) weeks on
industry projects as defined in this chapter.
(B) An applicant for a new or renewed temporary license
under subdivision (d)(3)(A) of this section shall submit the same items as
are required in subdivision (d)(1) of this section.
(e) A specialist sign electrician under § 17-28-101 shall qualify for
an endorsement on his or her license authorizing the licensee to maintain and
repair parking lot lights upon successfully passing a separate examination as
approved by the board.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 17-28-302 is repealed.
17-28-302. Electrical contractor license.
(a) Any person, member, or employee of a firm, partnership, or
corporation desiring to engage in the business of electrical contractor may
apply for and be issued a license upon satisfying the Board of Electrical
Examiners of the State of Arkansas that he or she or it is either a master
electrician or employs a master electrician as its superintendent or manager
and shall pay a license fee in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) per
04-07-2025 15:06:51 LGL199

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB627
year.
(b) Any electrical contractor having met the requirements of this
chapter may work in any municipality in the state without further
examinations after first showing evidence of state license as described in
this chapter and paying such fees as required by the municipality in which
the work is to be performed.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 17-28-308 is amended to read as follows:
17-28-308. Electrical apprentices.
(a) Upon proper application and payment of the fee, the Board of
Electrical Examiners of the State of Arkansas shall register as an electrical
apprentice and issue a certificate of registration to any person who
furnishes satisfactory proof that the applicant is enrolled in a school or
training course for electrical apprentices certified by the United States
Office of Apprenticeship.
(b) The board shall take such actions as are reasonably necessary or
appropriate to supervise and enforce apprenticeship supervision ratios
established by the board by rule.
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section,
an apprentice who has successfully completed a certified school or training
program and has been released for testing may continue to renew his or her
apprentice registration card, if otherwise qualified, without enrolling in a
school or training program shall test within one (1) year of release by the
Office of Skills Development.
(d) Application for an initial certificate of registration and renewal
of an electrical apprentice shall be the responsibility of the school or
training course for electrical apprentices certified by the United States
Office of Apprenticeship in which the electrical apprentice is enrolled.
(e) The school or training course for electrical apprentices certified
by the United States Office of Apprenticeship in which the electrical
apprentice is enrolled shall be responsible for documenting on-the-job
training hours of apprentice electricians and submitting completion of hours
to the board when releasing an apprentice electrician for testing.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 17-28-309 is amended to read as follows:
17-28-309. Penalties.
04-07-2025 15:06:51 LGL199

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB627
(a) The Director of the Division of Occupational and Professional
Licensing Boards and Commissions Secretary of the Department of Labor and
Licensing or his or her designee is authorized to petition any court of
competent jurisdiction to enjoin or restrain any person who performs
electrical work without a license or who otherwise violates the provisions of
this chapter.
(b)(1) A civil penalty may be assessed against any person, firm, or
corporation by the Division of Occupational and Professional Licensing Boards
and Commissions Department of Labor and Licensing and subject to appeal and
hearing before the Board of Electrical Examiners of the State of Arkansas
according to the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.,
if it is determined that a person, firm, or corporation has violated any:
(A) Provision of this chapter;
(B) Provision of the Arkansas Electrical Code Authority
Act, § 20-31-101 et seq.;
(C) Rule or order issued or promulgated by the board; or
(D) Condition of a license, certificate, or registration
issued by the board.; or
(E) Licensure eligibility concerning criminal records
under § 17-3-102.
(2) For each violation, the penalty shall not exceed the
following: one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day.
(A) Two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for a first offense;
(B) Seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) for a second
offense; or
(C) One thousand dollars ($1,000) for a third offense.
(3) Each day of a continuing violation is a separate violation
for purposes of penalty assessment.
(4)(A) Assessment of a civil penalty by the board shall be made
no later than two (2) years after the date of the occurrence of the
violation.
(B) No civil penalty may be assessed until the person
charged with the violation has been given the opportunity for a hearing on
the violation.
(5) If any person, firm, or corporation against whom a civil
penalty has been imposed fails to pay the penalty within sixty (60) days of
04-07-2025 15:06:51 LGL199

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB627
the board’s decision, the director secretary or his or her designee may file
an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to collect the civil penalty
without paying costs or giving bond for costs.
(6) Any penalties collected under this section shall be
deposited as special revenues into the State Treasury to the credit of the
Department of Labor and Licensing Special Fund, there to be used by the
Department of Labor and Licensing in carrying out the functions, powers, and
duties of this chapter.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 17-28-310 is repealed.
17-28-310. Grandfather clause.
(a) Applicants for a license under this chapter shall be exempt from
the examination requirement of § 17-28-203, provided that the applicant:
(1) Is qualified by experience requirements to take the
examination for a particular license classification under the provisions of
this chapter and the rules of the Board of Electrical Examiners of the State
of Arkansas;
(2) Has not had a municipal electrician's license or a state
electrician's license of any classification revoked or suspended for cause;
(3) Submits the appropriate fee; and
(4) Applies for a license before July 1, 1998.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, an applicant for a
license under this section shall be exempt from the journeyman electrician
examination requirement of § 17-28-203 if he or she has completed electrical
apprenticeship training and education under a bona fide apprenticeship
program registered with the United States Office of Apprenticeship and he or
she meets the requirements of subdivisions (a)(2)-(4) of this section.
(c) An applicant for a specialist sign electrician license under this
chapter shall be exempt from the examination requirement of § 17-28-203 if
the applicant:
(1) Is qualified by experience requirements to take the
examination for a particular license classification under this chapter and
the rules of the board;
(2) Has not had a municipal electrician's license or a state
electrician's license of any classification revoked or suspended for cause;
(3) Submits the appropriate fee; and
04-07-2025 15:06:51 LGL199

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB627
(4) Applies for the specialist sign electrician license before
September 1, 2009.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 17-28-311(a), concerning continuing
education requirements for electrician licensees, is amended to read as
follows:
(a) A journeyman electrician licensee, residential journeyman
electrician licensee, or master electrician licensee, or residential master
electrician licensee shall complete at least eight (8) hours of continuing
education for each the current National Electrical Code cycle in the first
year of each new code cycle before renewing his or her license.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 17-33-101(8), concerning definitions
pertaining to HVACR workers, is amended to read as follows:
(8) “HVACR gas fitting work" means gas fitting work for the purpose of
supplying an HVACR system and shall be limited to installing six feet (6′)
seventy-five feet (75’) or less final of gas piping connection to a heating
unit from an existing, accessible manual safety shutoff gas cock, installing
flue gas vents and combustion air for the HVACR system;

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 17-33-101(16)(A), concerning definitions
pertaining to HVACR workers, is amended to read as follows:
(A) Does not hold a Class A, Class B, Class C, Class D, or
Class E HVACR license;

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 17-33-103(b), concerning HVACR electrical
work, is amended to read as follows:
(b) Any individual licensed or registered to perform HVACR work may
perform electrical connections to heating and air conditioning units without
obtaining any other license to perform the work, so long as the connection is
made to a disconnecting means suitable in capacity for the equipment to be
served and is provided by others within ten feet (10′) seventy-five feet (75’)
of the unit.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 17-33-105(a)(1)(A)(ii), concerning
penalties, is amended to read as follows:
04-07-2025 15:06:51 LGL199

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB627
(ii) The penalty shall not exceed two hundred fifty
dollars ($250) one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation per day, and
each day of a continuing violation may be deemed a separate violation for
purposes of penalty assessments.

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 17-33-202(7), concerning the powers and
duties of the HVACR Licensing Board, is amended to read as follows:
(7) Review applications for examination for a Class A, Class B,
Class C, Class D, Class E, and Class L license;

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 17-33-202(9), concerning the powers and
duties of the HVACR Licensing Board, is amended to read as follows:
(9) Establish by board rule a maximum of four (4) eight (8)
hours per year International Mechanical Code cycle of continuing education if
the board determines that a specific class of license requires continuing
education;

SECTION 16. Arkansas Code § 17-33-204 is amended to read as follows:
17-33-204. Fees.
(a)(1) The HVACR Licensing Board shall adopt a fee schedule by rule
and regulation. The fee schedule may include, but is not limited to:
(A) Testing fees;
(B) License fees;
(C) Civil penalty fees;
(D) Registration fees;
(E) Inspection fees;
(F) Fees for code books Renewal fees;
(G) Late renewal fees; and
(H) Late penalty fees.
(2) The board may provide for a reduction in the fees of a
person or partnership who holds one (1) or more licenses determined by the
board to be HVACR-related and for which the board determines a reduction in
fees should be allowed.
(b) Until a fee schedule is established by the board, the licensure
and registration fees shall be as follows:
Class A License ............. $200.00
04-07-2025 15:06:51 LGL199

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB627
Class B License ............. 150.00
Class C License ............. 100.00
Class D License ............. 150.00
Class E License ............. 150.00
Class L License ............. No Charge
Registration Fee ............. 25.00.
(c) The fees established by the board for licensure and registration
shall not exceed the amounts provided for in subsection (b) of this section.

SECTION 17. Arkansas Code § 17-33-303 is amended to read as follows:
17-33-303. Classes of licenses.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, every individual who
designs, installs, constructs, maintains, services, repairs, alters, or
modifies any HVACR system or any portion of an HVACR system in the State of
Arkansas shall obtain one (1) of the following classes of license and pay the
fees prescribed by the HVACR Licensing Board;
(1) Class A — Entitles the licensee to perform HVACR work
without limitation to BTUH or horsepower capacities;
(2) Class B — Entitles the licensee to perform HVACR work on
air conditioning systems that develop a total of not more than fifteen (15)
twenty-five (25) tons of cooling capacity per unit or one million (1,000,000)
BTUH heating input per unit and refrigeration systems of fifteen horsepower
(15 h.p.) or less per unit;
(3) Class C — Entitles the licensee who is in the business of
servicing and repairing heating, ventilation, air conditioning, or
refrigeration equipment for the public to service, repair, or replace
components of HVACR equipment and to perform HVACR work on air conditioning
systems that develop a total of not more than fifteen (15) tons of cooling
capacity per unit or one million (1,000,000) BTUH heating input per unit and
refrigeration systems of fifteen horsepower (15 h.p.) or less per unit. A
Class C license holder shall not install any original HVACR equipment or
replace any existing HVACR equipment;
(4)(3) Class D — Entitles the licensee to perform sheet metal
work as it relates to ductwork for HVACR systems without regard to or
limitation of horsepower of the system to which the duct connects. The
licensee in this category is prohibited from the sale, installation, and
04-07-2025 15:06:51 LGL199

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB627
service of HVACR equipment and systems;
(5)(4) Class E — Entitles the licensee to perform refrigeration
work as defined in § 17-33-101 without regard to or limitation of horsepower.
The licensee in this category is prohibited from the sale, installation, and
service of heating and air conditioning equipment used for the treatment of
air for human comfort requirements; and
(6)(5) Class L — Entitles a licensee to apply for and obtain a
restricted lifetime license without having to pay a license fee in any
specific category of license as defined in this chapter. The applicant must
be at least sixty-five (65) years of age and hold a current license in good
standing with the board. The board shall promulgate rules to define the
specific requirements of the lifetime license.
(b) The board shall promulgate rules necessary to carry out the
provisions of this section.
(c)(1) An individual may perform HVACR work under a Class A, Class B,
Class C, Class D, or Class E HVACR license holder by registering with the
Department of Labor and Licensing.
(2) The registrant shall pay an annual registration fee as
required by the board. Annual registration, including without limitation
payment of the fee as required by the board, for the registrant shall be the
responsibility of the HVACR license holder.
(3) All licensees are responsible for ensuring that all HVACR
employees hold a current HVACR registration or HVACR license.

SECTION 18. Arkansas Code § 17-33-307 is amended to read as follows:
17-33-307. Grounds for suspension or revocation.
The HVACR Licensing Board, on its own motion, may make investigations
and conduct hearings and, on its own motion or upon complaint in writing
signed and verified by the complainant, suspend or revoke any license or
registration if it finds that the holder of the license or registrant has:
(1) Made a material misstatement in the application for license
or registration or renewal thereof;
(2) Demonstrated incompetency to act as a license holder or
registrant according to rules and standards promulgated by the board; or
(3) Violated any provisions of this chapter or any rule or order
prescribed by the board.; or
04-07-2025 15:06:51 LGL199

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB627
(4) Pled guilty or nolo contendere to or been found guilty of
any offense listed under § 17-3-102.

SECTION 19. Arkansas Code § 17-55-101(c)(2)(C), concerning the
licensure of electrical inspectors, is amended to read as follows:
(C)(i) Proof of completion of at least sixteen (16) eight
(8) hours of continuing education.
(ii) The board shall promulgate rules to set
standards for continuing education for licensees under subdivision
(c)(2)(C)(i) of this section. The rules shall include without limitation
continuing education on the statewide standards for the construction,
installation, and maintenance of electrical facilities and the performance of
electrical work under § 20-31-104.
(iii) The Division of Occupational and Professional
Licensing Boards and Commissions Department of Labor and Licensing may
conduct or sponsor continuing education classes for electrical inspectors.

SECTION 20. Arkansas Code § 17-55-101(d)(2), concerning the licensure
of electrical inspectors, is amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) A civil penalty may be assessed against an electrical
inspector by the Division of Occupational and Professional
Licensing Boards and Commissions Department of Labor and Licensing and
subject to appeal and hearing before the board according to the Arkansas
Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq., if it is determined that
the electrical inspector has violated a:
(i) Provision of this chapter;
(ii) Rule or order issued or promulgated by
the board; or
(iii) Condition of a license issued by the board,
including without limitation a licensee having a criminal record as
prohibited under § 17-3-102.
(B) For each violation, the civil penalty shall not exceed
the following: one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day.
(i) Two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for a first
offense;
(ii) Seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) for a second
04-07-2025 15:06:51 LGL199

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB627
offense; or
(iii) One thousand dollars ($1,000) for a third
offense.
(C) Each day of a continuing violation is a separate
violation for purposes of penalty assessment.
(D)(i) Assessment of a civil penalty by the board shall be
made no later than two (2) years after the date of the occurrence of the
violation.
(ii) A civil penalty shall not be assessed until the
person charged with the violation has been given the opportunity for a
hearing on the violation.
(E) If an electrical inspector against whom a civil
penalty has been imposed fails to pay the penalty within sixty (60) days of
the board's decision, the Director of the Division of Occupational and
Professional Licensing Boards and Commissions Secretary of the Department of
Labor and Licensing or his or her designee may file an action in a court of
competent jurisdiction to collect the civil penalty without paying costs or
giving bond for costs.
(F) Any penalties collected under this section shall be
deposited as special revenues into the State Treasury to the credit of the
Department of Labor and Licensing Special Fund, there to be used by the
Department of Labor and Licensing department in carrying out the functions,
powers, and duties of this chapter.

SECTION 21. Arkansas Code § 17-55-103 is repealed.
17-55-103. Persons employed as electrical inspectors as of August 16,
2013.
(a) A person employed as an electrical inspector as of August 16,
2013, shall be issued a temporary electrical inspector license upon
submission of the following information to the Board of Electrical Examiners
of the State of Arkansas:
(1) Proof of employment with the state or a political
subdivision of the state as an electrical inspector in the State of Arkansas;
(2) Verification of work experience as required by rule of the
board; and
(3) Payment of a license fee as required by rule of the board.
04-07-2025 15:06:51 LGL199

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB627
(b)(1) A temporary license issued under this section shall expire on
January 1, 2014.
(2) A recipient of a temporary license shall be eligible to
apply for an electrical inspector license under this chapter.

SECTION 22. Arkansas Code § 20-23-101(3), concerning definitions
pertaining to boiler safety, is amended to read as follows:
(3) “Internal” and “external” inspection means a thorough and
proper inspection as provided for in the rules by the Boiler Inspection
Division Section;

SECTION 23. Arkansas Code § 20-23-103 is amended to read as follows:
20-23-103. Enforcement.
(a) The criminal penalties provided by this chapter shall be enforced
by the prosecuting attorney of each judicial district. The administrative
penalties provided by this chapter shall be imposed pursuant to rules of the
Director of the Division of Labor Secretary of the Department of Labor and
Licensing or his or her designee.
(b) The director secretary or his or her designee may collect an
administrative penalty imposed pursuant to this chapter in a civil action in
a court of competent jurisdiction, and he or she shall not be required to pay
costs or to enter a bond for payment of costs.

SECTION 24. Arkansas Code § 20-23-104 is amended to read as follows:
20-23-104. Periodic or regular attendance.
(a) All boilers subject to the provisions of this chapter shall be
continuously monitored by mechanical and electronic devices approved by the
Director of the Division of Labor Secretary of the Department of Labor and
Licensing or his or her designee. When a plant is in operation or when any
public building is occupied, the boilers shall be under regular attendance by
a boiler operator unless otherwise exempt.
(b) Boilers that are manually operated shall be under constant
attendance whenever they are in use for any purpose.
(c) All steam boilers fifty horsepower (50 hp) and over, as rated by
the manufacturer in any location, and steam boilers used in hospitals,
hotels, schools, theatres, and office buildings, but not limited to these
04-07-2025 15:06:51 LGL199

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB627
places, shall be under regular attendance by a licensed operator who holds a
certificate of competency issued by the Boiler Inspection Division Section.

SECTION 25. Arkansas Code § 20-23-105 is amended to read as follows:
20-23-105. Disposition of funds.
(a) All money received under this chapter shall be paid to the
Treasurer of State, who shall place this money to the credit of the
Department of Labor and Licensing Special Fund, there to be used by the
Department of Labor and Licensing in carrying out the functions, powers, and
duties as set out in this chapter and to defray the costs of the maintenance,
operation, and improvements required by the department in carrying out the
functions, powers, and duties otherwise imposed by law on the department or
the Director of the Division of Labor Secretary of the Department of Labor
and Licensing or his or her designee.
(b) The director may issue vouchers for salaries and expenses of the
Boiler Inspection Division when proper appropriation has been made for the
expenditures.

SECTION 26. Arkansas Code § 20-23-202 is amended to read as follows:
20-23-202. Chief inspector, deputy inspector, etc.
(a)(1) When the office of Chief Inspector of the Boiler Inspection
Division Section becomes vacant, the Director of the Division of Labor
Secretary of the Department of Labor and Licensing or his or her designee
shall employ a citizen of the State of Arkansas to be chief inspector.
(2) The chief inspector shall have at the time of employment not
less than ten (10) five (5) years' experience in the construction,
maintenance, installation, and repair or inspection of high pressure boilers
and unfired pressure vessels.
(b)(1)(A) The director secretary or his or her designee is authorized
and empowered to employ a technical assistant and deputy inspectors of
boilers.
(B) Inspectors of steam boilers and unfired pressure
vessels shall have had at the time of employment not less than five (5) three
(3) years' experience in the construction, maintenance, installation, and
repair of high pressure boilers and unfired pressure vessels or possess a
currently valid commission from the National Board of Boiler and Pressure
04-07-2025 15:06:51 LGL199

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB627
Vessel Inspectors.
(C)(i) Inspectors of steam boilers and unfired pressure
vessels also shall have passed a written examination.
(ii) The examination shall conform to standards not
exceeding those prescribed by the Boiler and Pressure Vessel Code of the
American Society of Mechanical Engineers.
(iii) The examination shall test the inspector's
knowledge of the construction, installation, maintenance, and repair of
boilers and their appurtenances.
(2) The director secretary or his or her designee is also
empowered to employ clerical and administrative employees, as well as other
inspectors, as necessary to perform the work of the Boiler Inspection
Division Section.
(3) The salaries are to be approved by the General Assembly.
(c) The salaries of the employees of the Boiler Inspection Division
Section, together with the necessary expenses of the Boiler Inspection
Division Section, shall be paid out of the fees for which provision is made
in this chapter.

SECTION 27. The introductory language of Arkansas Code § 20-23-203(a),
concerning the duties of the Chief Inspector of the Boiler Inspection
Division, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The Chief Inspector of the Boiler Inspection Division Section,
either personally or by a deputy inspector, shall carefully:

SECTION 28. Arkansas Code § 20-23-203(c), concerning the duties of the
Chief Inspector of the Boiler Inspection Division, is amended to read as
follows:
(c)(1) The chief inspector shall enforce the laws of the state
governing the use of boilers and unfired pressure vessels. He or she shall
examine into and report to Director of the Division of Labor the Secretary of
the Department of Labor and Licensing or his or her designee the causes of
boiler explosions which occur within the state.
(2) He or she shall keep in his or her office a complete and
accurate record of the names of all owners or operators of boilers inspected
by the Boiler Inspection Division Section, together with the location, make,
04-07-2025 15:06:51 LGL199

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB627
type, dimensions, age, condition, pressure allowed upon, and date of the last
inspection of all boilers and shall make an annual report thereon to the
director secretary or his or her designee.

SECTION 29. Arkansas Code § 20-23-301 is amended to read as follows:
20-23-301. Certificate of inspection required – Application of rules
and standards – Penalties.
(a)(1) No owner or user of a boiler or pressure vessel or engineer or
fireman in charge of a boiler or pressure vessel shall operate or allow the
boiler or pressure vessel to be operated without a certificate of inspection
issued by the Director of the Division of Labor Secretary of the Department
of Labor and Licensing or his or her designee or shall allow a greater
pressure in the boiler or pressure vessel than is allowed by the certificate
of inspection.
(2)(A) All boilers and pressure vessels installed or in
operation in this state shall conform to those rules and standards that shall
from time to time be adopted by the Boiler Inspection Division Section with
the approval of the director secretary or his or her designee.
(B) The rules and standards shall not exceed those set out
in the several sections of the Boiler and Pressure Vessel Code of the
American Society of Mechanical Engineers and shall have the force of law
immediately upon their approval by the director secretary or his or her
designee.
(3) No person shall operate or cause to be operated any boiler
or unfired pressure vessel on which the certificate of inspection has been
suspended or the operation of which has been forbidden by an inspector as
provided in §§ 20-23-203, 20-23-306, 20-23-310, 20-23-401, and 20-23-402.
(4) All pressure piping installed in this state shall conform to
those rules and standards that shall from time to time be adopted by the
Boiler Inspection Division Section with the approval of the director
secretary or his or her designee. The rules and standards shall not exceed
those set out in the American Society of Mechanical Engineers Code for
Pressure Piping, Power Piping Code, B31.1.
(b) Any person violating this section shall be subject to an
administrative fine of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) nor more
than one thousand dollars ($1,000).
04-07-2025 15:06:51 LGL199

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB627

SECTION 30. Arkansas Code § 20-23-302 is amended to read as follows:
20-23-302. Report by manufacturer, owner, and user.
(a) Every manufacturer, owner, or user of a boiler or unfired pressure
vessel in use or to be used in any part of the state and subject to
inspection by the Boiler Inspection Division Section, as provided by this
chapter, shall report to the division Boiler Inspection Section the location
of the boiler or unfired pressure vessel at such times and in such manner and
form as may be determined by the rules of the division Boiler Inspection
Section.
(b) Any owner, user, or agent of the owner of any boiler or unfired
pressure vessel subject to inspection by the division Boiler Inspection
Section, as provided in this chapter, who shall fail to report its location
to the division Boiler Inspection Section shall be subject to an
administrative fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100).

SECTION 31. Arkansas Code § 20-23-304 is amended to read as follows:
20-23-304. Failure to make ready for inspection.
Any owner, user, or agent of the owner of any boiler subject to
inspection by the Boiler Inspection Division Section who shall fail to have a
boiler ready for inspection after due notice as provided in this chapter
shall pay to the division Boiler Inspection Section the inspection fee
provided by this subchapter and shall be subject to an administrative fine of
any sum not less than ten dollars ($10.00).

SECTION 32. Arkansas Code § 20-23-305 is amended to read as follows:
20-23-305. Special inspection.
(a) If at any time the owner, user, or agent of the owner of any
boiler within the state shall desire a special inspection of any boiler, it
shall be made by the Boiler Inspection Division Section after due request
thereof.
(b) The inspector making the inspection shall collect a fee of one
hundred dollars ($100) for each boiler together with his or her expenses from
Little Rock to the place of inspection and return.

SECTION 33. Arkansas Code § 20-23-306 is amended to read as follows:
04-07-2025 15:06:51 LGL199

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB627
20-23-306. Issuance.
(a)(1) Upon receipt by the Boiler Inspection Division Section of an
annual or biennial certificate report of inspection from a state inspector or
from an inspector employed by an insurance company that a boiler or pressure
vessel is in safe working condition with the required fittings, valves, and
appliances properly installed and set, the Director of the Division of Labor
Secretary of the Department of Labor and Licensing or his or her designee
shall issue to the owner of the boiler or pressure vessel a certificate of
inspection.
(2) The certificate of inspection shall be issued upon payment
of a fee of fifteen dollars ($15.00) in cases of all boilers other than
unfired pressure vessels and a fee of thirty dollars ($30.00) in cases of
unfired pressure vessels.
(3) The certificate of inspection shall state the maximum
pressure at which the boiler or pressure vessel may be operated as may be
determined by the rules adopted by the Boiler Inspection Division Section, as
provided in this chapter.
(b) Upon receipt of a certificate of inspection under subsection (a)
of this section, unless the certificate of inspection is withdrawn or
suspended, the owner or user may operate boilers:
(1) Other than unfired pressure vessels described in the
certificate for one (1) year from the date of annual inspection plus any
extension granted under § 20-23-203(a) of the time for the next annual
inspection; and
(2) That are unfired pressure vessels for two (2) years from the
date of biennial inspection.
(c) Any owner or operator of a boiler or pressure vessel who is
dissatisfied with the result of an inspection made by an inspector employed
by an insurance company may appeal to the Chief Inspector of the Boiler
Inspection Division Section, who shall cause a special investigation to be
conducted and, upon the report of the inspection, shall render his or her
decision, the decision to be final.

SECTION 34. Arkansas Code § 20-23-307 is amended to read as follows:
20-23-307. New boilers and unfired pressure vessels – Permit required.
(a) Every manufacturer, contractor, jobber, owner, or user of a boiler
04-07-2025 15:06:51 LGL199

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB627
or unfired pressure vessel or pressure piping system shall obtain a permit
from the Boiler Inspection Division Section before any boiler or unfired
pressure vessel or pressure piping system may be installed or moved and
installed in the State of Arkansas.
(b) When new boilers or unfired pressure vessels are to be installed,
the manufacturer's data report for each boiler and unfired pressure vessel
shall be submitted with the application for installation.
(c) No boiler or unfired pressure vessel or pressure piping may be
installed without approval from the division Boiler Inspection Section.

SECTION 35. Arkansas Code § 20-23-308 is amended to read as follows:
20-23-308. New boilers and unfired pressure vessels – Fees.
(a) The following fees shall be paid before permits may be issued for
the installation of any boiler or unfired pressure vessel:
(1) Boilers:
(A) Up to 25 200 horsepower, incl. $15.00 $25.00
(B) Over 25 horsepower to 50 horsepower, incl. 20.00
(C) Over 50 horsepower to 100 horsepower, incl. 25.00
(D) Over 100 horsepower to 200 horsepower, incl. 30.00
(E) Over 200 horsepower to 300 horsepower, incl. 50.00
(F) Over 300 horsepower to 400 horsepower, incl. 60.00
(G) Over 400 horsepower to 500 horsepower, incl. 70.00
(H) Over 500 200 horsepower $95.00 $45.00
(2) Unfired pressure vessels, including hot water storage
containers: $30.00
(A) 500 gallons capacity or less $15.00
(B) 501 gallons capacity to 1,000 gallons capacity 20.00
(C) 1,001 gallons capacity to 5,000 gallons capacity 40.00
(D) 5,001 gallons capacity and over 50.00
(b) The fee paid for the issuance of a permit for the installation of
pressure piping shall be one hundred dollars ($100).

SECTION 36. Arkansas Code § 20-23-310 is amended to read as follows:
20-23-310. Suspension.
(a)(1) The Chief Inspector of the Boiler Inspection Division Section
or his or her authorized representatives representative may at any time
04-07-2025 15:06:51 LGL199

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB627
suspend an inspection certificate when in their his or her opinion the boiler
or unfired pressure vessel for which it was issued cannot be operated without
menace to the public safety or when the boiler or unfired pressure vessel is
found not to comply with the rules provided in this subchapter.
(2) Any insurance company inspector or inspection service
provider who has been issued an Arkansas commission and is inspecting boilers
or pressure vessels in this state shall have corresponding powers with
respect to operating certificates for boilers or pressure vessels insured by
the company employing him or her.
(3) The suspension of an operating certificate shall continue in
effect until the boiler or pressure vessel shall have been made to conform to
the rules of the Boiler Inspection Division Section and until the operating
certificate shall have been reinstated.
(b) Any inspector of the division Boiler Inspection Section or any
commissioned inspector of any insurance company or inspection service
provider who after inspection of a boiler or unfired pressure vessel shall
find it unsafe for operation shall suspend its certificate of inspection and
forbid its further use until it shall have been made to conform to the
standards adopted by the division Boiler Inspection Section and until its
certificate of inspection shall have been reinstated by an authorized
inspector.

SECTION 37. Arkansas Code § 20-23-311 is amended to read as follows:
20-23-311. Inspection fees generally.
(a) Within thirty (30) days from the date of inspection, there shall
be paid for the annual inspection of each boiler by the Boiler Inspection
Division Section made according to the provisions of this chapter, the sum as
follows:
(1) Boilers: $25.00; and
(A) Up to and including 15 horsepower, incl. $10.00
(B) Over 15 horsepower to 50 horsepower, incl. 13.00
(C) Over 50 horsepower to 100 horsepower, incl. 18.00
(D) Over 100 horsepower to 150 horsepower, incl. 20.00
(E) Over 150 horsepower to 250 horsepower, incl. 23.00
(F) Over 250 horsepower to 500 horsepower, incl. 35.00
(G) Over 500 horsepower 50.00
04-07-2025 15:06:51 LGL199

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB627
(2) Shop inspections: per day, four hundred forty dollars
($440); per half day, two hundred and twenty dollars ($220); plus expenses,
including mileage not to exceed the rate authorized by the General Assembly
to employees of state agencies who furnish their own transportation, and
meals and lodging in accordance with that approved by the General Assembly as
a daily allowance; and
(3) Unfired pressure vessels: $15.00
(A) 150 gallons or less $9.00
(B) 151 gallons to 500 gallons 10.00
(C) 501 gallons to 1,000 gallons 11.00
(D) 1,001 gallons to 2,000 gallons 12.00
(E) 2,001 gallons to 3,000 gallons 13.00
(F) 3,001 gallons to 5,000 gallons 14.00
(G) 5,001 gallons and over 18.00
(b) The rates in subsection (a) of this section may be reduced by the
Director of the Division of Labor Secretary of the Department of Labor and
Licensing or his or her designee at the beginning of any fiscal year if the
rates produce a greater amount of revenue than is required to defray the cost
of operation of the Boiler Inspection Division Section.
(c) All inspection fees shall be paid by the owner, user, or agent of
the owner, and the inspector may receive the fee and issue his or her receipt
therefor.
(d) If the owner, user, or agent of the owner shall fail to pay any
inspection fee under this section within thirty (30) days, a civil money
penalty equal to the amount of the unpaid fee shall attach to the outstanding
amount of the fee, and the director secretary or his or her designee shall be
empowered to collect this penalty in addition to the amount of the fee.

SECTION 38. Arkansas Code § 20-23-312 is amended to read as follows:
20-23-312. Inspection fees – Collection.
(a)(1) In addition to other remedies provided for by this chapter, if
after the making of any inspection or accrual of any charge or penalty
required or authorized by this chapter, the fee, penalty, or charge is not
paid within thirty (30) days after demand upon whoever is liable therefor,
the Director of the Division of Labor Secretary of the Department of Labor
and Licensing or his or her designee may employ an attorney, who is empowered
04-07-2025 15:06:51 LGL199

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB627
without payment of costs or giving of bond for costs to institute suit in the
name of the State of Arkansas in any court of competent jurisdiction to
collect the fees, penalties, costs, and charges.
(2)(A) The court where suit is brought pursuant to subdivision
(a)(1) of this section for collection of fees, penalties, and charges shall,
without limitation, based on the actual amount of the judgment award an
attorney's fee equal to the actual cost to the Division of Labor Department
of Labor and Licensing or the Boiler Inspection Division Section for the
regular hourly rate of pay of the attorney multiplied by the actual hours,
including, but not limited to, travel time, litigation, and case review.
(B) Furthermore, the court shall award, without
limitation, based on the actual amount of the judgment an amount equal to all
costs incurred by the Division of Labor department or the Boiler Inspection
Division Section, including, but not limited to, travel costs, witness fees,
sheriff's service fees, or costs incurred pursuant to the collection of any
judgment obtained by the Division of Labor department or the Boiler
Inspection Division Section.
(b)(1) The plaintiff in the suits is given a lien upon the boiler and
all parts, connections, and attachments thereto, whether attached to the land
or not, to accrue the payment of the inspection fees for making the
inspection.
(2) The lien shall attach to the property at the time of making
the inspection and shall continue until all inspection fees are paid.
(3) The lien, when it so attaches, shall be held to be prior,
paramount, and superior to the liens, claims, and demands of all persons
whomsoever, whether owners, agents, mortgagees, trustees, and beneficiaries
under trusts or owners whether prior in time or not.

SECTION 39. Arkansas Code § 20-23-314 is amended to read as follows:
20-23-314. Pressure piping inspections.
(a) The installation of pressure piping shall be periodically
inspected during the course of the installation by an inspector commissioned
pursuant to the provisions of § 20-23-401 in the manner and with the
frequency prescribed by the rules of the Boiler Inspection Division Section.
(b)(1) Upon completion of the installation of any pressure piping, a
final inspection shall be made, and the inspector shall complete a final
04-07-2025 15:06:51 LGL199

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB627
inspection report on a form approved by the Director of the Division of Labor
Secretary of the Department of Labor and Licensing or his or her designee.
(2) A copy of the final inspection report shall be filed with
the Boiler Inspection Division Section within thirty (30) days of completion
of the installation.
(c) If the report required by subsection (b) of this section is not
filed within thirty (30) days after completion of the installation, the
Boiler Inspection Division Section shall designate an inspector in its employ
to make the inspection and report required by subsection (b) of this section.
(d) The inspections and reports required by subsections (a) and (b) of
this section may be made by an inspector in the employ of the Boiler
Inspection Division Section.
(e) For each inspection made by an inspector employed by the Boiler
Inspection Division Section and required by subsection (a), subsection (b),
or subsection (c) of this section, the holder of the installation permit
shall pay the Boiler Inspection Division Section an inspection fee in the
amount of four hundred forty dollars ($440) per day or two hundred twenty
dollars ($220) per half-day, plus expenses and mileage at the rates
authorized for employees of the Division of Labor who furnish their own
transportation.
(f) The inspections required by this section and the installation
permit required for pressure piping by § 20-23-307 shall apply only to new
installations and shall not be construed as requiring an inspection or an
installation permit for maintenance, repair, or renovation of existing
facilities.

SECTION 40. Arkansas Code § 20-23-401(a), concerning certificates of
competency and commissions of inspectors of the Boiler Inspection Division,
is amended to read as follows:
(a) Certificates of competency and commissions as inspectors of
boilers shall be issued by the Boiler Inspection Division Section to persons
in the employ of any company authorized to insure boilers against explosions
in this state or by a qualified inspection service provider.

SECTION 41. Arkansas Code § 20-23-401(f)(1), concerning commissions
issued relating to boiler safety, is amended to read as follows:
04-07-2025 15:06:51 LGL199

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB627
(f)(1) Any commission issued under this subchapter shall be
immediately returned to the division Boiler Inspection Section when the
inspector to whom it has been issued shall cease to be employed by the
insurance company or inspection service provider employing him or her at the
time the commission was issued.

SECTION 42. Arkansas Code § 20-23-402 is amended to read as follows:
20-23-402. Inspectors employed by insurance companies or private
inspection service providers.
(a) Boiler inspectors employed by insurance companies or private
inspection service providers which are authorized to insure boilers in this
state shall hold certificates of competency issued by the Boiler Inspection
Division Section as provided in this section and shall:
(1) Inspect internally and externally at least one (1) time
annually or within the time granted under § 20-23-203(a) all high pressure
steam boilers insured by their respective companies;
(2) Inspect externally one (1) time annually and internally one
(1) time every three (3) years every low pressure steam heating boiler
insured by their respective companies; and
(3) Inspect unfired pressure vessels biennially.
(b) The insured boilers shall be exempt from all inspections other
than those of the respective insurance company inspectors unless there is
some evidence that proper inspection is not being made.
(c) Within thirty (30) days following each internal inspection made by
its inspectors, each insurance company shall file a copy of the internal
inspection report and date of the inspection with the Boiler Inspection
Division Section on forms approved by the Division of Labor Secretary of the
Department of Labor and Licensing or his or her designee.
(d)(1) Each insurance company shall file a report annually of all
boilers insured and inspected showing location, owner, state number, and date
of last inspection.
(2) The report shall be filed not later than January 30 of each
calendar year.
(e)(1) If annual reports are not filed with the Boiler Inspection
Division Section by insurance companies who have insurance on boilers in the
State of Arkansas within sixty (60) days from the date they are due
04-07-2025 15:06:51 LGL199

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB627
inspection, the Boiler Inspection Division Section shall make the required
inspection.
(2) A special inspection fee of one hundred dollars ($100) for
each boiler or unfired pressure vessel inspected, plus mileage and expenses
from Little Rock to point of inspection and return not to exceed the current
rate authorized by the General Assembly to employees of state agencies who
furnish their own transportation, plus any meals and hotel bills incurred
shall be charged to the insurance company insuring the boilers or unfired
pressure vessels unless an extension of time is granted by the Chief
Inspector of the Boiler Inspection Division Section.
(f) No operating certificate issued for an insured boiler inspected by
an insurance company inspector shall be valid after the boiler for which it
was issued shall cease to be insured by a company authorized by this state to
carry the insurance.

SECTION 43. Arkansas Code § 20-23-404 is amended to read as follows:
20-23-404. Operators.
(a)(1) The Boiler Inspection Division Section or an authorized
representative of the Boiler Inspection Section shall conduct examinations
for each applicant seeking a boiler operator's license.
(2) The examination may be either written or oral shall be
written.
(3) Each applicant shall pay a fee of twenty-five dollars
($25.00) for the examination and the first license.
(4) Each license shall be renewed annually. The annual fee shall
be seventeen dollars ($17.00).
(5) Before the applicant may participate in an examination, he
or she shall have had not less than six (6) months of on-the-job training.
Proof of this on-the-job training shall be furnished to the Division of Labor
Boiler Inspection Section by the employer before the examination.
(6) A restricted license may be issued to an applicant who has
passed the examination required in this subsection but who has not met the
requirements of subdivision (a)(5) of this section, provided that:
(A) The restricted license shall be effective for one (1)
year from the date of issue; and
(B) The licensee is to work under the direction and
04-07-2025 15:06:51 LGL199

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB627
supervision of a regularly licensed boiler operator.
(b)(1) Any operator found operating a boiler without a certificate
issued by the Boiler Inspection Division Section or operating a boiler
knowing it to be defective shall have his or her license revoked at once.
(2) Any person found operating a boiler without an operator's
license shall be subject to an administrative fine of not less than twenty-
five dollars ($25.00) and not more than one hundred dollars ($100).

SECTION 44. Arkansas Code § 20-23-405 is amended to read as follows:
20-23-405. Sellers, installers, and repairers, and inspection service
providers.
(a)(1) All persons, firms, or corporations engaged in the sale, or
installation, or inspection services of boilers, unfired pressure vessels,
hot water storage containers, or pressure piping in any location shall be
licensed by the Boiler Inspection Division Section to perform the work.
(2) The annual license fee shall be seventy-five dollars
($75.00) per year, payable in advance on or before January 31 of each
calendar year.
(b)(1) All persons, firms, or corporations engaged in the repair of
boilers or unfired pressure vessels shall be licensed by the division Boiler
Inspection Section.
(2) The annual license fee shall be seventy-five dollars
($75.00) annually, payable in advance on or before January 31 of each
calendar year.
(c) Each person, firm, or corporation shall furnish evidence suitable
to the division Boiler Inspection Section that the person, firm, or
coporation corporation is qualified to perform the work.
(d) The license of any person, firm, or corporation may be revoked by
the division Boiler Inspection Section upon proof that the person, firm, or
corporation is not performing the work in compliance with this chapter and
the rules as provided in this chapter.
(e) Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be
guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of
not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than one thousand dollars
($1,000) or by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years or by both fine
and imprisonment.
04-07-2025 15:06:51 LGL199

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB627
(f) The provisions of §§ 20-23-104, 20-23-307 — 20-23-309, 20-23-
403, 20-23-404, and this section shall not apply to firms under the
regulation of the United States Surface Transportation Board.

SECTION 45. Arkansas Code § 20-23-406 is amended to read as follows:
20-23-406. Restricted lifetime license – Certificate of competency and
commission.
(a)(1)(A) Upon reaching sixty-five (65) years of age or any time
thereafter, any person who has been a boiler inspector for no fewer than
twelve (12) years may apply for a restricted lifetime boiler inspector's
certificate of competency and commission.
(B) The certificate of competency and commission shall be
issued upon satisfactory proof of age and upon payment of a fee prescribed by
the division Boiler Inspection Section.
(2)(A) Upon reaching sixty-five (65) years of age or any time
thereafter, any person who has been a boiler operator for no fewer than
twelve (12) years may apply for a restricted lifetime boiler operator's
license.
(B) The license shall be issued upon satisfactory proof of
age and upon payment of a fee prescribed by the division Boiler Inspection
Section.
(3)(A) Upon reaching sixty-five (65) years of age or any time
thereafter, any person who has been engaged in the sale or installation of
boilers, unfired pressure vessels, hot water storage containers, or pressure
piping for no fewer than twelve (12) years may apply for a restricted
lifetime license.
(B) The license shall be issued upon satisfactory proof of
age and upon payment of a fee prescribed by the division Boiler Inspection
Section.
(4)(A) Upon reaching sixty-five (65) years of age or any time
thereafter, any person who has been engaged in the repair of boilers or
unfired pressure vessels for no fewer than twelve (12) years may apply for a
restricted lifetime license.
(B) The license shall be issued upon satisfactory proof of
age and upon payment of a fee prescribed by the division Boiler Inspection
Section.
04-07-2025 15:06:51 LGL199

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB627
(b) The division Boiler Inspection Section shall promulgate rules
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

SECTION 46. Arkansas Code § 20-23-407 is amended to read as follows:
20-23-407. Owner or user inspection programs.
(a) Any owner or user of a steam boiler or pressure vessel subject to
this chapter may perform any inspections required by this chapter on such
vessels owned or operated by the owner or user if the owner or user meets the
requirements prescribed by rule of the Director of the Division of Labor
Secretary of the Department of Labor and Licensing or his or her designee.
(b) The director secretary or his or her designee shall set out
requirements for the certification of owner or user inspectors and
certification of owner or user inspection programs by rule and shall have
full authority to promulgate and enforce those rules.
(c)(1)(A) After notice and opportunity for hearing, any owner or user
who is found to have violated rules prescribed by the director secretary or
his or her designee pursuant to this subchapter shall be assessed a civil
monetary penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) or more than
five thousand dollars ($5,000).
(B) Each day that a violation continues shall be
considered a separate violation.
(2) The director secretary or his or her designee may bring a
civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction to recover the amount of
any civil monetary penalties.
(d) In addition to civil monetary penalties, any owner or user who is
found to be in violation of this section shall be guilty of a Class A
misdemeanor.

SECTION 47. Arkansas Code § 20-24-106(a), concerning the powers and
duties of the Elevator Safety Board, is amended to read as follows:
(a) It shall be the duty of the Elevator Safety Board to license
elevator inspectors, elevator mechanics, elevator testing contractors, and
elevator contractors as provided in this chapter and to revoke or suspend any
such license for cause.

SECTION 48. The introductory language of Arkansas Code § 20-24-
04-07-2025 15:06:51 LGL199

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB627
108(c)(2), concerning application requirements, is amended to read as
follows:
(2) To be eligible for an elevator contractor license or
elevator testing contractor license, the applicant or licensee shall:

SECTION 49. Arkansas Code § 20-24-109 is amended to read as follows:
20-24-109. Application and examination for licenses – Issuance and
renewal.
(a)(1) A written application for the examination and license for
elevator inspector, elevator mechanic, elevator testing contractor, or
elevator contractor shall be made upon a form to be supplied by the Elevator
Safety Board upon request and shall be accompanied by a statement of the
applicant's experience together with an examination fee not to exceed one
hundred fifty dollars ($150).
(2) The examination shall be given not more than six (6) months
from the date when the applicant makes the application.
(3)(A) If the applicant is qualified and successfully passes the
applicable examination specified in this section, then upon payment of a
license fee, he or she shall be entitled to: a one-year license as an
elevator inspector, elevator mechanic, elevator testing contractor, or
elevator contractor.
(i) A one-year license as an elevator inspector or
elevator contractor; or
(ii) A two-year license as an elevator mechanic.
(B) The license fee and the license renewal fee shall be
established by the board, but in no event shall either fee exceed one
thousand dollars ($1,000).
(4)(A) There shall be no limit to the number of times an
applicant may seek a license as provided in this section, except that a
rejected applicant may not make application within six (6) months from the
date on which he or she is notified that he or she has failed to qualify.
(B) A license fee shall be paid for the initial
examination and each subsequent examination.
(b) The board may license a person as an elevator inspector, elevator
mechanic, elevator testing contractor, or elevator contractor without
examination if he or she holds an equivalent license for a state or city that
04-07-2025 15:06:51 LGL199

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB627
has a standard of examination substantially equal to that provided for in §
20-24-108.
(c) The board shall renew a license after receiving:
(1) Payment of the license renewal fee; and
(2) Submission of proof that the licensee has satisfied the
continuing education requirements established by rule of the board.
(d)(1) Whenever an emergency exists and the board determines that
there are not enough licensed elevator mechanics to perform the work
necessary to provide for the safety of life, limb, and property and to
protect the public welfare, the board may waive the requirements of this
chapter and issue an emergency elevator mechanic license that may be valid
for no longer than thirty (30) days.
(2) Whenever the board determines that there are not enough
licensed elevator mechanics available to perform work necessary for the
completion of a project for which the Division of Occupational and
Professional Licensing Boards and Commissions Department of Labor and
Licensing has issued a permit under § 20-24-115(d), the board may waive the
requirements of this chapter and issue a temporary elevator mechanic license
that may be valid for no longer than thirty (30) days.
(3) The board may renew an emergency or temporary license if the
circumstances justifying its original issuance continue.

SECTION 50. Arkansas Code § 20-24-110(c), concerning prohibited
activities of elevator inspectors, is amended to read as follows:
(c) No elevator inspector shall recommend or refer one (1) of his or
her clients or customers to a specific business, firm, or corporation which
manufactures, installs, repairs, alters, tests, or services elevators,
escalators, or dumbwaiters.

SECTION 51. DO NOT CODIFY. HVACR Class C license transfer.
As of September 1, 2025, all active and current Class C license holders
will be Class B license holders and may perform all HVACR work previously
permitted with a Class C license and that of a Class B license.

/s/Irvin

04-07-2025 15:06:51 LGL199